Florida, session 2026, HB367.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 627.42398, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
627.42398 Caps on cost-sharing requirements for insulin
and diabetes supplies.—
(1) As used in this section, the term "cost-sharing
requirement" means an insured's deductible, coinsurance,
copayment, or similar out-of-pocket expense.
(2) This section applies to all health insurance policies
delivered, issued, renewed, or amended in this state on or after
January 1, 2027, including policies provided by group, blanket,
or franchise health insurers; prepaid limited health service
organizations and discount plan organizations; and health
maintenance organizations.
(3) A health insurance policy may not impose a cost-
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb367-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 367 2026
sharing requirement that exceeds $35 for a 30-day supply of
insulin for any insured, regardless of the quantity or type of
insulin prescribed.
(4) A health insurance policy may not impose a cost-
sharing requirement that exceeds $100 for 30 days of diabetes
supplies, including blood-glucose test strips, glucometers,
continuous glucometers, lancets, lancing devices, or insulin
syringes, which are used to cure, diagnose, mitigate, prevent,
or treat diabetes or low blood sugar for any insured, regardless
of the quantity or type of supplies prescribed.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb367-00